California, session 20252026, AB2595.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 21214.9 is added to the Vehicle Code, to read:21214.9. (a) This section shall be known, and may be cited, as the San Mateo Electric Bicycle Safety Pilot Program.(b) A local authority within the County of San Mateo, or the County of San Mateo in unincorporated areas, may, by ordinance or resolution, prohibit a person under 12 years of age from operating a class 1 or 2 electric bicycle.(c) (1) A violation of an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section shall be punishable as follows:(A) For the first 60 days after the prohibition comes into effect, a warning notice.(B) After the first 60 days, a violation of the ordinance or resolution shall be an infraction punishable by a fine of twenty-five dollars ($25).(2) A record of the action shall not be transmitted to the court and a fee shall not be imposed upon a citation for this infraction if the parent or legal guardian of the person who violated the prohibition delivers proof to the issuing agency within 120 days after the citation was issued that the person has completed an electric bicycle safety and training program pursuant to Section 894 of the Streets and Highways Code. Code, or a related electric bicycle safety course, if one is available, as prescribed by authorities in the local jurisdiction.(3) If an unemancipated minor violates an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section, a parent or legal guardian with control or custody of the minor shall be jointly and severally liable with the minor for the amount of a fine imposed pursuant to this subdivision.(d) (1) If an ordinance or resolution is adopted pursuant to this section, the county shall, by January 1, 2030, submit a report to the Legislature that includes all of the following:(A) The total number of traffic stops initiated for a violation of the ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section.(B) The results of those traffic stops, including whether a warning or citation was issued, property was seized, or an arrest was made.(C) The number of times a person was stopped for allegedly operating a class 1 or class 2 electric bicycle while under 12 years of age but was found to be over the age limit.(D) If a warning or citation was issued, a description of the warning or the violation cited.(E) If an arrest or traffic stop was made, the offense cited by the officer for the arrest or traffic stop and the perceived race or ethnicity, gender, and approximate age of the person stopped, provided that the identification of these characteristics is solely based on the observation and perception of the peace officer who initiated the traffic stop.(F) The actions taken by a peace officer during a traffic stop, including, but not limited to, all of the following:(i) Whether the peace officer asked for consent to search the person and, if so, whether consent was provided.(ii) Whether the peace officer searched the person or property, and, if so, the basis for the search and the type of contraband or evidence discovered.(iii) Whether the peace officer seized property and, if so, the type of property that was seized and the basis for seizing the property.(G) The number of times a person opted to complete, and did complete, the training course in lieu of paying the fine.(H) The number of times that a person under 12 years of age was operating an electric bicycle and was involved in a crash that resulted in a permanent, serious injury, as defined in Section 20001, or a fatality in the six months prior to the adoption of the ordinance or resolution, the cause of the crash, and the class of the electric bicycle that was being operated at the time of the crash.(I) The number of times that a person under 12 years of age was operating an electric bicycle and was involved in a crash that resulted in a permanent, serious injury, as defined in Section 20001, or a fatality after the adoption of the ordinance or resolution, the cause of the crash, and the class of the electric bicycle that was being operated at the time of the crash.(2) A report submitted pursuant to this section shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.(e) A local authority shall administer a public information campaign for at least 30 calendar days prior to the enactment of an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to this section, which shall include public announcements in major media outlets and press releases.(f) (1) A local authority that adopts an ordinance or resolution pursuant to this section before the date upon which the report required under the San Diego Electric Bicycle Safety Pilot Program pursuant to Section 21214.7 is publicly released shall hold a public meeting to review and consider the substance of that report within 90 days of the public release of the report.(2) On and after the date upon which the report required under the San Diego Electric Bicycle Safety Pilot Program pursuant to Section 21214.7 is publicly released, a local authority proposing to adopt an ordinance or resolution pursuant to this section shall review and consider the substance of that report at a public hearing on the proposed ordinance or resolution. (f)(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.